Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1235
Vessels propelled by sail or hand power; lights required.

(1) Under the conditions described in section 37-1232, all vessels when propelled by sail alone shall carry (a) a lantern or flashlight and (b) the red and green side lights suitably screened, but not the white lights, prescribed by sections 37-1233 and 37-1234. Vessels of all classes when so propelled shall carry a white light placed as nearly as practicable at the stern showing an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of one hundred thirty-five degrees and so fixed as to show the light sixty-seven and five-tenths degrees from right aft on each side of the vessel.

(2) Rowboats and canoes or other vessels under hand power shall display a white light showing an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of three hundred sixty degrees in time to avoid collision.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 35;

Laws 1989, LB 169, § 3.